New Jersey, session 221, A470.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, and to the extent permitted under federal law, whenever a municipality, utility, or contractor, is engaged in a road construction project on a road under the jurisdiction of the municipality, the municipality, utility, or contractor may, upon the approval of the governing body of the municipality, employ either law enforcement personnel, or any other appropriately trained construction and work zone personnel, to provide traffic control services for the management of traffic through the area of the project. b.    The Commissioner of Transportation shall establish minimum training requirements for construction and work zone personnel that provide traffic control services, as described in subsection a. of this section. c.     As used in this section: "Contractor" means a person entering into a contract with a municipality or utility for services to improve, repair, construct, or maintain a municipal road, and includes a subcontractor. "Road construction project" or "project" means any improvement, repair, construction, or maintenance project completed by, or on behalf of, a municipality or utility on any road under the jurisdiction of the municipality with a posted speed limit of 25 miles per hour or less. "Utility" means a person who owns or operates for public use any infrastructure, franchise, or license for the transmission of telecommunications service, including broadband Internet service, or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, sewage services, or gas. 2.    Notwithstanding any provision of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the Commissioner of Transportation may adopt immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law regulations as the Commissioner of Transportation deems necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 360 days following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and may thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the Commissioner of Transportation in accordance with the requirements of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to municipal road construction projects commenced at least 90 days after the date of enactment.